Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Employment Agencies.

Administrative Code. —

For private employment agencies, see 8 AAC 10.

Collateral references. —

27 Am. Jur. 2d, Employment Agencies, §§ 1-7.

51 C.J.S., Labor Relations, § 19.

Regulation of private employment agencies. 20 ALR3d 599.

Liability of employment agency for personal injury or property damage suffered by employer from acts of referred employee or by employee from acts of referred employer. 41 ALR4th 531.

Sec. 23.15.330.
Exemptions.

AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

do not apply to an educational, religious, charitable, fraternal, or benevolent organization that does not charge for services, or to a bona fide labor organization or a government agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1953)

Sec. 23.15.340.
Permit.

In order to operate an employment agency, a person shall obtain a permit from the department.
The permit shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the employment agency.

History.

(§ 3(1) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.350.
Application.

To obtain a permit to operate an employment agency a person shall apply to the department on forms prescribed by the department.
The application must include

the name and address of the applicant and the street and number of the building or place where the business of the employment agency is to be conducted;

the businesses or occupations engaged in by the applicant for at least two years immediately preceding the date of application; and

the names and addresses of all persons financially interested in the operation of the agency.

History.

(§ 3(2) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.360.
Bond.

The department may not issue a permit until the applicant furnishes a bond to the department in the amount and with surety that the department considers necessary. The amount of the bond may not be less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000. The bond shall be conditioned on the applicant’s full compliance with the provisions and requirements imposed by AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

and the payment of all judgments recovered against the applicant for violation of AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

and any judgment and costs recovered against the applicant by a laborer, worker, or applicant for a position due to wilful misrepresentation or wilful deceit of a laborer or applicant for a position.

History.

(§ 3(3) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.370.
Investigation of applicant.

Upon application for a permit, the department may make an investigation as to the character and responsibility of the applicant and the premises where the applicant proposes to conduct the business.

History.

(§ 3(4) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.380.
Refusal of permit.

The department may, after notice and hearing, refuse to grant a permit where there is reasonable ground to believe that the applicant is of unfit moral character or is irresponsible. The department shall grant or refuse an application within 30 days of the date of filing.

History.

(§ 3(5) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.390.
Term of permit; fees.

The fee for filing an application for a permit is $10. A permit is valid for a term of two years. The biennial fee for the issuance of a permit, including a renewal permit, is $100. All fees shall be deposited in the general fund. In addition to paying this fee, all persons conducting employment agencies shall comply with the provisions of AS 43.70 (Alaska Business License Act).

History.

(§ 3(6) ch 94 SLA 1953; am § 51 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.400.
Renewal of permit.

Thirty days before the expiration of a permit the holder must apply for renewal of the permit in order to renew the permit. The application for renewal must contain all the information requested in the original application, brought up to date.

History.

(§ 3(7) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

Sec. 23.15.410.
Revocation or suspension of permit.

The department may revoke or suspend a permit if

the permittee or an agent of the permittee has violated or failed to comply with a provision of AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

;

the permittee has stopped being of good moral character.

Before revoking or suspending a permit, the department shall notify the holder in writing of the charges and provide the permittee an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

History.

(§ 3(8) (9) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Sec. 23.15.420.
Limitations on conduct of employment agencies.

The department may not issue a permit to conduct an employment agency

in rooms used for living purposes;

in connection with a pool hall, bar, or intoxicating liquor dispensary, or recreation center operated for profit;

to a person whose permit has been revoked within three years from the date of application;

to a person who is financially interested in a travel agency or who in any way benefits financially from the sale of air, steamship, or bus transportation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 94 SLA 1953)

Sec. 23.15.430.
Agency to maintain register.

An employment agency shall keep a register containing the name and address of each applicant, the date registered, and the amount of fee received.

History.

(§ 5(1) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

Sec. 23.15.440.
Records open to inspection.

All registers, books, records, and other papers kept under AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

shall be open to the inspection of the department at all reasonable times.
The agency shall furnish a copy of a record or report to the department within 30 days of the request.

History.

(§ 5(2) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

Sec. 23.15.450.
Applicant’s receipt.

An agency shall give to an applicant for employment from whom a fee is to be received a receipt.
The receipt must contain

the name, address, and telephone number of the employment agency;

the name of the applicant;

the name and address of the person to whom the applicant is sent for employment, and the address to which the applicant is to report for work;

the amount of the fee charged and collected from the applicant;

the kind of work to be performed, the wages or salary, and other conditions of employment.

History.

(§ 5(3) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

Sec. 23.15.460.
Schedule of fees.

A person conducting an employment agency shall file a schedule of its fees with the department.
The agency may change the fee schedule, but a change is not effective until seven days after it is filed with the department and until it is posted for not less than seven days in a conspicuous place in the agency. The agency shall post a copy of the fee schedule in the agency in a conspicuous place frequented by applicants for help or employment.

History.

(§ 5(4) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

For fee schedule, see 8 AAC 10, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Construction and operation of fee payment provisions of employment agency contract. 61 ALR3d 375.

Sec. 23.15.470.
Maximum fees.

After notice and hearing the department shall set a maximum schedule of fees.
The department may review the schedule every two years after giving notice and hearing.

History.

(§ 5(5) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

For fee schedule, see 8 AAC 10, art. 3.

Sec. 23.15.480.
Return of fees.

If the applicant paying a cash fee fails to obtain employment, the agency shall, upon demand, return the amount of the fee to the applicant within 48 hours.

History.

(§ 5(6) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

Sec. 23.15.490.
Prohibited acts.

An employment agency may not

send out an applicant for employment without having a bona fide request from an employer;

send a person to an employer for the purpose of assisting or conducting an illegitimate business or practice;

place a child in employment in violation of the child labor laws;

divide or offer to divide a fee with an employer;

make a charge that does not conform with the schedule of fees;

falsify a record of the agency;

write, publish, or have published false, fraudulent, or misleading information, representation, notice, or advertisement concerning a job opportunity;

send an applicant for employment to a place where a strike or lockout exists without informing the applicant of the existence of the strike or lockout.

History.

(§ 5(7) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

For fee schedule, see 8 AAC 10, art. 3.

Sec. 23.15.500.
Department may adopt regulations.

The department may adopt regulations consistent with AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

.

History.

(§ 5(8) ch 94 SLA 1953)

Administrative Code. —

For application, bond and permit, see 8 AAC 10, art. 1.

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.

For fee schedule, see 8 AAC 10, art. 3.

For prohibited acts, see 8 AAC 10, art. 4.

Sec. 23.15.510.
Violations.

A person who wilfully violates any provision of AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both. However, this section does not apply to the violation of the requirement under AS

23.15.390

to comply with AS 43.70.

History.

(§ 6 ch 94 SLA 1953; added by § 1 ch 65 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 104 SLA 2008)

Sec. 23.15.520.
Definitions.

In AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

,

“employment agency” or “agency” means a person engaged in the business of furnishing employment or help, or giving information as to where employment or help may be obtained, or furnishing information regarding employment, or displaying an employment sign or bulletin, or, through the medium of a card, circular, or pamphlet, or otherwise offering to obtain employment or help, or a person who offers employment information through communications media, including, but not limited to, radio, television, and newspapers;

“fee” means money or other valuable consideration received by a person, paid or promised to be paid for services given to or be given by a person conducting an employment agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 197 SLA 1970; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For agency procedures and requirements, see 8 AAC 10, art. 2.